California, session 20252026, AB2575.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1714.48 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1714.48. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.(2) (A) “Automated decision system” means a computational process derived from machine learning, statistical modeling, data analytics, or artificial intelligence that issues simplified output, including a score, classification, or recommendation, that is used to assist or replace human discretionary decisionmaking and materially impacts natural persons.(B) “Automated decision system” does not include a spam email filter, firewall, antivirus software, identity and access management tools, calculator, database, dataset, or other compilation of data.(3) “Clinical decision support system” means an automated decision system or generative artificial intelligence system whose outputs are produce a prediction, classification, recommendation, evaluation, or analysis that is used to inform clinical decisionmaking with respect to the provision, timing, or course of patient care.(4) “Generative artificial intelligence” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1339.75 of the Healthy and Safety Code.(b) In an action against a defendant who developed, modified, selected, or deployed a clinical decision support system that is alleged to have caused harm to the plaintiff, it shall not be a defense, and the defendant may not assert, that the failure of a licensed health care professional or other health care worker to override an output of the clinical decision support system is a superseding cause severing the defendant’s liability for the alleged harm.(c) This section does not limit or preclude a defendant from presenting either of the following:(1) Any other affirmative defense, including evidence relevant to causation or foreseeability.(2) Other evidence relevant to the comparative fault of any other person or entity.SEC. 2. Section 1339.76 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1339.76. (a) A On or before July 1, 2027, a health facility, clinic, physician’s office, or office of a group practice that uses or deploys a clinical decision support system for patient care shall provide written notice of required information, described in subdivision (b), to any licensed health care professional or other person using a clinical decision support system or viewing outputs from a clinical decision support system. make available, upon request from a licensed health care professional or other person using a clinical decision support system or viewing outputs from a clinical decision support system, an inventory of all clinical decision support systems currently in use or deployed for patient care. This list shall be updated at least annually.(b) Required information under subdivision (a) A health facility, clinic, physician’s office, or office of a group practice that uses or deploys a clinical decision support system for patient care shall make available, upon request from a licensed health care professional or other person using a clinical decision support system or viewing outputs from a clinical decision support system, information about the clinical decision support system. Information required by this subdivision shall include all of the following:(1) Details on A summary of the clinical decision support system, including developer and description of output. the output produced by the system.(2) Intended use of the clinical decision support system, including intended patient population, intended users, and intended decisionmaking role. role in supporting clinical decisionmaking.(3) Cautioned out-of-scope use of the clinical decision support system, including known risks and limitations.(4)List of the inputs into the clinical decision support system. (5)Description (4) Summary of how the clinical decision support system generates outputs.(6)Development details of the clinical decision support system including, but not limited to, all of the following: (A)Description (5) Summary of the training set or clinical research underlying recommendations, including demographic representativeness and known biases based on protected characteristics.(B)Description of the relevance of training data to deployed setting.(C)Process used to ensure fairness in development of the intervention.(7)Description(6) Summary of the validation process.(8)Qualitative(7) Summary of qualitative measures of performance.(9)Description of ongoing maintenance of intervention implementation and use.(10)Description of updates and continued validation or fairness assessment process.(11)Notice that a worker providing direct patient care may override the output of a clinical decision support system if, in the independent professional judgment of the worker acting within their scope of practice, the override is necessary to meet the applicable standard of care or comply with applicable law.(c)A disclosure made pursuant to this section shall be provided consistent with all of the following:(1)To a new licensed health care professional or other person upon hire, onboarding, or credentialing, if that individual will likely use the clinical decision support system or view outputs from the clinical decision support system.(2)At least 90 days before a new clinical decision support system is first deployed for patient care.(3)On or before February 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, by providing an updated inventory of all clinical decision support systems currently in use or deployed for patient care.(8) A link to the Certified Health IT Product List produced by the Office of the National Coordinator for Health Information Technology at the United States Department of Health and Human Services.(c) A health facility, clinic, physician’s office, or office of a group practice that uses or deploys a clinical decision support system for patient care shall notify a licensed health care professional or other person whose duties include using a clinical decision support system or viewing outputs from a clinical decision support system, upon hire and annually, of their right to request the inventory of all clinical decision support systems currently in use or deployed for patient care.(d) (1) A violation of this section by a licensed health facility is subject to the enforcement mechanisms described in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1290) of Chapter 2. Sections 1280 and 1280.3.(2) A violation of this section by a licensed clinic is subject to the enforcement mechanisms described in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1235) of Chapter 1. Section 1229.(3) A violation of this section by a physician is subject to the jurisdiction of the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, as appropriate.(4)A violation of this section constitutes “unfair competition” as defined in Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code and is punishable as prescribed in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Artificial intelligence” has the same meaning as in Section 1339.75.(2) (A) “Automated decision system” means a computational process derived from machine learning, statistical modeling, data analytics, or artificial intelligence that issues simplified output, including a score, classification, or recommendation, that is used to assist or replace human discretionary decisionmaking and materially impacts natural persons.(B) “Automated decision system” does not include a spam email filter, firewall, antivirus software, identity and access management tools, calculator, database, dataset, or other compilation of data.(3) “Clinic” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1200.(4) “Clinical decision support system” means an automated decision system or generative artificial intelligence system whose outputs are produce a prediction, classification, recommendation, evaluation, or analysis that is used to inform clinical decisionmaking with respect to the provision, timing, or course of patient care.(5) “Generative artificial intelligence” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1339.75.(6) “Health facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1250.(7) “Office of a group practice” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1339.75.(8) “Physician’s office” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1339.75.(f) This section does not apply to the use of a clinical decision support system for documentation, communication, or other administrative tasks that do not involve the application of professional judgment by a licensed health care professional, including, but not limited to, automated messages to inform patients of their health records.SEC. 3. Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 2820) is added to Chapter 2 of Division 3 of the Labor Code, to read: Article 2.7. Health Information Technology: Worker Rights2820. For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.(b) (1) “Automated decision system” means a computational process derived from machine learning, statistical modeling, data analytics, or artificial intelligence that issues simplified output, including a score, classification, or recommendation, that is used to assist or replace human discretionary decisionmaking and materially impacts natural persons.(2) “Automated decision system” does not include a spam email filter, firewall, antivirus software, identity and access management tools, calculator, database, dataset, or other compilation of data.(c) “Clinical decision support system” means an automated decision system or generative artificial intelligence system whose outputs are produce a predication, classification, recommendation, evaluation, or analysis that is used to inform clinical decisionmaking with respect to the provision, timing, or course of patient care.(d) “Generative artificial intelligence” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1339.75 of the Health and Safety Code.2821. (a) It is the public policy of the State of California that a worker providing direct patient care be free to use their professional judgment to make assessments and decisions within their scope of practice as appropriate for their patients.(b) (1) An employer shall not retaliate or discriminate against a worker providing direct patient care using their professional judgment to make an assessment or decision within their appropriate scope of practice based solely on the worker’s override of, or reliance on, the output of a clinical decision support system.(2) This subdivision does not affect a worker’s duty to meet the applicable standard of care, act within their scope of practice as outlined in Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or exercise independent professional judgment in providing direct patient care.(c) A worker who is subject to retaliation or discrimination in violation of this article has the right under this article to file a complaint with the Labor Commissioner against an employer who retaliates or discriminates against the worker.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.